Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4617.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. An owner may apply to the local assessing officer for deferment of the payment of special assessments on the owner's homestead. The application shall must be made upon on an affidavit form to be furnished and made available provided by the department at convenient locations throughout the this state. The affidavit form shall must contain the following statement in 10-point boldface boldfaced type located immediately above the affiant's signature: "If this deferment is authorized the state will place a lien on your property." A person An individual making a false affidavit for the purpose of obtaining deferment of special assessments under this act is guilty of perjury. If the homestead is owned jointly by husband and wife, a married couple, each spouse shall sign and file the affidavit. If the homestead is encumbered by a mortgage or an unpaid balance on a land contract, a deferment of special assessments shall must not be made without the written consent of the mortgagee or the land contract vendor, which shall must be filed with the affidavit. The affidavit shall must be filed with the local assessing officer at least 30 days after the due date of a special assessment or installment of a special assessment for which deferment is requested. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.